lt-LT: Arklio priežiūros įrankio tipas: Grandiklis; Kietas šepetys; Priežiūros blokelis; Priežiūros pirštinė; Masažinis grandiklis; Metalinis grandiklis; Guminis grandiklis; Kailio keitimo ašmenys; Prakaito brauktukas; Kita
pt-PT: tipo de tratador de cavalos: Almofaça; Escova de raízes; Bloco de limpeza; Luva de limpeza; Almofaça de massagem; Almofaça de metal; Almofaça de borracha; Lâmina de desbaste; Rodo de suor; Outro
es: Tipo de recortadora para caballos: Almohaza; Cepillo de raíces; Bloque de aseo; Manopla de aseo; Almohaza de masaje; Almohaza de metal; Almohaza de goma; Cuchilla de despeleche; Raspador de sudor; Otro
sk-SK: Typ česadla na kone: Žbilko; Ryžáková kefa; Čistiaci kameň; Čistiaca rukavica; Masážne žbilko; Kovové žbilko; Gumové žbilko; Zrezávač srsti; Stierka na pot; Iné
sl-SI: Vrsta pripomočka za nego konj.: Čohalo; Dandy krtača; Kamen za čiščenje; Rokavica za čiščenje; Masažno čohalo; Kovinsko čohalo; Gumijasto čohalo; Rezilo za odstranjevanje dlake; Nož za odstranjevanje znoja; Drugo
zh-CN: 马匹梳理工具类型: 马梳; 硬毛刷; 清洁块; 清洁手套; 按摩梳; 金属马梳; 橡胶马梳; 去浮毛刮刀; 刮汗板; 其他
th: ประเภทผู้ดูแลม้า: แปรงขูดขนม้า; แปรงขนแข็ง; หินขัดขนม้า; ถุงมือแปรงขนม้า; แปรงนวด; แปรงเหล็กขูดขน; แปรงยางขูดขนม้า; ใบมีดสางขน; ที่รีดเหงื่อ; อื่นๆ
ja: 馬の手入れタイプ: カレーコーム; ダンディブラシ; グルーミングブロック; グルーミングミット; マッサージカレー; 金属製カレーコーム; ラバーカレーコーム; シェディングブレード; 汗こき; その他
pl: Typ narzędzia pielęgnacyjnego dla konia: Zgrzebło; Szczotka twarda; Blok do czyszczenia; Rękawica do czyszczenia; Zgrzebło do masażu; Metalowe zgrzebło; Gumowe zgrzebło; Nóż do sierści; Ściągaczka do potu; Inne
nb: Strigleredskapstype for hest: Strigle; Rotbørste; Pusseblokk; Pussehanske; Massasjestrigle; Metallstrigle; Gummistrigle; Røyteskrape; Svetteskrape; Annet
ru: Тип инструмента для груминга лошадей: Скребница; Жесткая щетка; Камень для груминга; Рукавица для чистки; Массажная скребница; Металлическая скребница; Резиновая скребница; Нож для линьки; Водосгон; Другое
pt-BR: Ferramenta de cuidado para cavalos tipo: Raspadeira; Escova dura; Bloco de limpeza; Luva de limpeza; Raspadeira de massagem; Raspadeira de metal; Raspadeira de borracha; Lâmina removedora de pelos; Raspador de suor; Outro
nl: Paardenborstel type: Roskam; Harde borstel; Poetsblok; Poetshandschoen; Massageroskam; Metalen roskam; Rubberen roskam; Zweetmes; Zweetmes; Overig
sv: Typ av hästskötare: Ryktskrapa; Rotborste; Ryktsten; Ryktvante; Massageskrapa; Ryktskrapa i metall; Gummiskrapa; Fällskrapa; Svettskrapa; Övrigt
de: Typ des Pferdepflegewerkzeugs: Striegel; Wurzelbürste; Putzblock; Putzhandschuh; Massagestriegel; Metallstriegel; Gummistriegel; Federstriegel; Schweißmesser; Sonstiges
da: Type af hestebørste: Strigle; Stiv børste; Strigleblok; Striglehandske; Massagestrigle; Metalstrigle; Gummistrigle; Fældestrigle; Svedskraber; Andet
hu: Lóápoló eszköz típusa: Vakaró; Gyökérkefe; Tisztítótégla; Ápolókesztyű; Masszázsvakaró; Fém vakaró; Gumi vakaró; Szőrvedlő penge; Izzadtsághúzó; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип уред или инструмент за грижа и разресване на коня: Чесало; Четка с твърд косъм; Блокче за почистване; Ръкавица за почистване; Масажно чесало; Метално чесало; Гумено чесало; Нож за смяна на козината; Стъргалка за пот; Друго
fi: Hevosen hoitovälineen tyyppi: Suka; Juuriharja; Hoitokivi; Hoitokinnas; Hierontasuka; Metallinen suka; Kuminen suka; Karvanlähtöterä; Hikinivo; Muu
vi: Loại dụng cụ chải lông ngựa: Bàn chải curry; Bàn chải cứng; Khối chải lông; Găng tay chải lông; Bàn chải massage; Bàn chải curry kim loại; Bàn chải curry cao su; Lưỡi dao cạo lông rụng; Dụng cụ gạt mồ hôi; Khác
zh-TW: 馬匹梳理工具類型: 咖哩梳; 硬毛刷; 梳理塊; 梳理手套; 按摩齒梳; 金屬齒梳; 橡膠齒梳; 脫毛刮刀; 刮汗板; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de îngrijitor de cai: Tesală; Perie aspră; Bloc de toaletare; Mănușă de toaletare; Tesală pentru masaj; Tesală metalică; Tesală de cauciuc; Lamă pentru năpârlire; Răzuitor pentru transpirație; Altele
cs: Typ střihacího strojku pro koně: Hřbílko; Dandy kartáč; Čisticí blok; Čisticí rukavice; Masážní hřbílko; Kovové hřbílko; Gumové hřbílko; Stěrka na srst; Stěrka na pot; Ostatní
fr: Type d’outil de pansage pour cheval: Étrille; Brosse dure; Bloc de pansage; Gant de pansage; Étrille de massage; Étrille en métal; Étrille en caoutchouc; Couteau de mue; Couteau de chaleur; Autre
ko: 말 관리사 유형: 커리 콤; 단디 브러시; 그루밍 블록; 그루밍 미트; 마사지 커리; 금속 커리 콤; 고무 커리 콤; 털갈이용 블레이드; 땀 긁개; 기타
tr: At bakım aracı türü: Kaşağı; Kaba fırça; Tımar bloğu; Tımar eldiveni; Masaj kaşağısı; Metal kaşağı; Kauçuk kaşağı; Tüy alma bıçağı; Ter sıyırıcı; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta timaritelja konja: Češagija; Dandy četka; Blok za timarenje; Rukavica za timarenje; Češagija za masažu; Metalna češagija; Gumena češagija; Oštrica za linjanje; Strugač znoja; Ostalo
en: Horse groomer type: Curry comb; Dandy brush; Grooming block; Grooming mitt; Massage curry; Metal curry comb; Rubber curry comb; Shedding blade; Sweat scraper; Other
it: Tipo di strumento per la toelettatura di cavalli: Striglia; Brusca; Blocco per strigliare; Guanto per strigliare; Striglia massaggiante; Striglia in metallo; Striglia in gomma; Lama da muta; Stecca levasudore; Altro
el: Τύπος εργαλείου περιποίησης αλόγου: Ξύστρα; Σκληρή βούρτσα; Μπλοκ περιποίησης; Γάντι περιποίησης; Ξύστρα μασάζ; Μεταλλική ξύστρα; Λαστιχένια ξύστρα; Λεπίδα απομάκρυνσης τριχώματος; Ξύστρα ιδρώτα; Άλλο